Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.354

Voluntary waiver of firearm rights—Health professionals.

Mental health professionals and substance use disorder professionals are encouraged to discuss the voluntary waiver of firearm rights with their patients if the mental health professional or substance use disorder professional reasonably believes that a discussion will avoid or minimize an imminent danger to the health or safety of the individual or any other individual; however, there is no obligation to do so.

[ 2023 c 262 s 5.]